Louisiana, session 2026, HB607.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The sum of Five Hundred Sixty-Six Thousand Three Hundred Fifty-Six
and No/100 ($566,356.00) Dollars plus applicable interest is hereby payable out of the State
General Fund (Direct) for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 for payment of the amended judgment
captioned "Dr. Mahtab A. Lodhi and Dr. Peter Yaukey versus Board of Supervisors of the
University of Louisiana and Peter Fos", signed on April 25, 2023, bearing Number 2015-
11537, Division D, on the docket of the Civil District Court, parish of Orleans, state of
Louisiana, as amended by the trial court on May 1, 2023, and as amended by the Court of
Appeal for the Fourth Circuit on August 5, 2024.
Section 2. Of the amount appropriated in Section 1 of this Act, an amount equal to
the sum of and One hundred Fifty Thousand Three Hundred Thirty-Six and No/100
($150,336.00) Dollars is payable for lost earnings and lost fringe benefits plus judicial
Page 1 of 3

HLS 26RS-612 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 607
interest on the sums from the date of judicial demand until paid as provided by law and the
judgment, is hereby payable for the portion of the amended judgment against the state of
Louisiana, through the Board of Supervisors of the University of Louisiana, and in favor of
Dr. Peter Yaukey.
Section 3. Of the amount appropriated in Section 1 of this Act, an amount equal to
the sum of and Four Hundred Sixteen Thousand Twenty and No/100 ($416,020.00) Dollars
is payable for lost earnings and lost fringe benefits plus judicial interest on the sums from
the date of judicial demand until paid as provided by law and the judgment, is hereby
payable for the portion of the amended judgment against the state of Louisiana, through the
Board of Supervisors of the University of Louisiana, and in favor of Dr. Mahtab A. Lodhi.
Section 4. A judgment may only be paid from this appropriation if it is final and shall
be paid as to lost earnings and lost fringe benefits as awarded in the judgment. Interest shall
be paid as provided by law and awarded in the judgment. If the provisions of the judgment
conflict with the provisions of this Act, the provisions of the judgment shall be controlling.
Any other provision of this Act not in conflict with the provisions of the judgment shall
control. Payment shall be made only after presentation to the state treasurer of
documentation required by the state treasurer. Further, the judgment shall be deemed to
have been paid on the effective date of this Act, and interest shall cease to run as of that date.
Section 5. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.